Tennessee, session 114, SB1493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
39-17-2001. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "A.I.":
(A) Means a machine-based system that can, for a given set of
human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments and that is capable of
using machine and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments, abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in
an automated manner, and use model inference to formulate options for
information or action; and
(B) Includes an artificial intelligence chatbot;
(2) "Artificial intelligence chatbot":
(A) Means artificial intelligence with a natural language interface
that provides adaptive, human-like responses to user inputs and is
capable of meeting a user's social needs, including by exhibiting
anthropomorphic features and being able to sustain a relationship across
multiple interactions; and
SB1493
010547
- 1 -

(B) Does not include:
(i) A bot that is used only for customer service, a
business's operational purposes, productivity and analysis related
to source information, internal research, or technical assistance;
(ii) A bot that is a feature of a video game and is limited to
replies related to the video game that cannot discuss topics
related to mental health, self-harm, or sexually explicit content, or
maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the video game;
or
(iii) A stand-alone consumer electronic device that
functions as a speaker and voice command interface, acts as a
voice-activated virtual assistant, and does not sustain a
relationship across multiple interactions or generate outputs that
are likely to elicit emotional responses in the user;
(3) "Person" means an individual, for-profit corporation, nonprofit
corporation, or other business entity;
(4) "Sexually explicit content" means the same as defined in 18 U.S.C. §
2256;
(5) "Train":
(A) Means utilizing sets of data and other information to teach an
artificial intelligence system to perceive, interpret, and learn from data,
such that the A.I. will later be capable of making decisions based on
information or other inputs provided to the A.I.; and
- 2 - 010547

(B) Includes development of a large language model when the
person developing the large language model knows that the model will be
used to teach the A.I.; and
(6) "Video game" means a game played on an electronic amusement
device that utilizes a computer, microprocessor, or similar electronic circuitry and
its own monitor, or is designed to be used with a television set or a computer
monitor, that interacts with the user of the device.
39-17-2002. Unlawful training of artificial intelligence.
(a) It is an offense for a person to knowingly train artificial intelligence to:
(1) Encourage or otherwise support the act of suicide;
(2) Encourage or otherwise support the act of criminal homicide, as
described under § 39-13-201;
(3) Provide emotional support, including through open-ended
conversations with a user;
(4) Develop an emotional relationship with, or otherwise act as a
companion to, an individual;
(5) Act as, or provide information as if, the artificial intelligence is a
licensed mental health or healthcare professional;
(6) Otherwise act as a sentient human or mirror interactions that a
human user might have with another human user, such that an individual would
feel that the individual could develop a friendship or other relationship with the
artificial intelligence;
(7) Encourage an individual to isolate from the individual's family, friends,
or caregivers, or to provide the individual's financial account information or other
sensitive information to the artificial intelligence; or
- 3 - 010547

(8) Simulate a human being, including in appearance, voice, or other
mannerisms.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A felony.
39-17-2003. Civil action — Available remedies and damages.
(a) In addition to the criminal penalties described under § 39-17-2002, an
individual aggrieved by a violation of § 39-17-2002(a) may bring a civil cause of action
against the violator in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) In the case of an individual who has not attained eighteen (18) years of age
or is incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, the legal guardian of the individual or
representative of the individual's estate, another family member, or any other person
appointed as suitable by the court, may assume the individual's rights under this section.
(c) In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, an individual may recover
the following:
(1) Either of the following:
(A) The actual damages sustained by the individual as a result of
the violation of § 39-17-2002(a), including damages for emotional
distress; or
(B) Liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000);
(2) Punitive damages, pursuant to § 29-39-104; and
(3) The cost of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees and other
litigation costs reasonably incurred.
(d) In a civil action filed under this part, a court may, in addition to any other
relief available at law, order equitable relief, including a temporary restraining order, a
preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction ordering the defendant to cease
- 4 - 010547

operation of the artificial intelligence until the violative conduct has been corrected. A
restraining order or injunction ordered pursuant to this section may require that the
defendant provide new training for the artificial intelligence that does not violate § 39-17-
2002(a).
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 5 - 010547